Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle A. Meetings.

§79-4-7.01.
Annual meeting.

Unless directors are elected by written consent in lieu of an annual meeting as permitted by Section 79-4-7.04, a corporation shall hold a meeting of shareholders annually at a time stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws; provided, however, that if a corporation’s articles of incorporation authorize shareholders to cumulate their votes when electing directors pursuant to Section 79-4-7.28, directors may not be elected by less than unanimous written consent.

Annual shareholders’ meetings may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws. If no place is stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, annual meetings shall be held at the corporation’s principal office.

The failure to hold an annual meeting at the time stated in or fixed in accordance with a corporation’s bylaws does not affect the validity of any corporate action.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 7.01; Laws, 2007, ch. 361, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

The 2007 amendment rewrote (a) to revise election of directors at the annual meeting.

Special meeting, see § 79-4-7.02.

Right of shareholder who signed demand for special meeting to apply for court-ordered meeting of shareholders, see § 79-4-7.03.

Notice of meeting, see § 79-4-7.05.

Appointment of party to voting agreement as proxy as being an appointment coupled with an interest, see § 79-4-7.22.

Copies of minutes of shareholders’ meetings to be maintained at corporation’s principal office, see § 79-4-16.01.

Although the shareholders did not ratify the president’s act of terminating an attorney’s position as an employee until more than a year after the fact, the action was invalidated by the lack of yearly meeting under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-4-7.01 which applied to the corporation by Miss. Code Ann. § 79-10-3. Jowett v. Scruggs, 901 So. 2d 638, 2004 Miss. App. LEXIS 768 (Miss. Ct. App. 2004), cert. denied, 901 So. 2d 1273, 2005 Miss. LEXIS 312 (Miss. 2005).

Remedies to restrain or compel holding of stockholders’ meetings. 48 A.L.R.2d 615.

Holding directors’, officers’, stockholders’, or sales meetings or conventions in a state by foreign corporation as doing business or otherwise subjecting it to service of process and suit. 84 A.L.R.2d 412.

Corporations: casting of ballots after closing of polls. 41 A.L.R.3d 234.

Participation in meeting as waiver of compliance with notice requirement for shareholders’ meeting. 64 A.L.R.3d 358.

Right of corporation to discharge employee who asserts right as stockholder.
84 A.L.R.3d 1107.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 789 et seq.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:994 et seq.

6B Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1642 et seq.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 635-678.

Holmes, The revised Model Business Corporation Act and corporate law reform in Mississippi.
57 Miss. L. J. 271, August, 1987.

§79-4-7.02.
Special meeting.

A corporation shall hold a special meeting of shareholders:

On call of its board of directors or the person or persons authorized to do so by the articles of incorporation or bylaws; or

Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, if shareholders having at least ten percent (10%) of all the votes entitled to be cast on an issue proposed to be considered at the proposed special meeting sign, date and deliver to the corporation one or more written demands for the meeting describing the purpose or purposes for which it is to be held. Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, a written demand for a special meeting may be revoked by a writing to that effect received by the corporation prior to the receipt by the corporation of demands sufficient in number to require the holding of a special meeting.

If not otherwise fixed under Section 79-4-7.03 or 79-4-7.07, the record date for determining shareholders entitled to demand a special meeting is the date the first shareholder signs the demand.

Special shareholders’ meetings may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws. If no place is stated or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, special meetings shall be held at the corporation’s principal office.

Only business within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice required by Section 79-4-7.05(c) may be conducted at a special shareholders’ meeting.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 7.02; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 49, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

Right of shareholder who signed demand for special meeting to apply for court-ordered meeting of shareholders, see § 79-4-7.03.

Timing of and information to be included in notice of special meeting, see § 79-4-7.05.

Remedies to restrain or compel holding of stockholders’ meeting. 48 A.L.R.2d 615.

Participation in meeting as waiver of compliance with notice requirement for shareholders’ meeting. 64 A.L.R.3d 358.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:995, 74:998.

6B Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1642-74:1644, 74:1651, 74:1655, 74:1656, 74:1676.

18 C.J.S., Corporations § 639.

§79-4-7.03.
Court-ordered meeting.

The chancery court of the county where a corporation’s principal office is located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state, may summarily order a meeting to be held:

On application of any shareholder of the corporation entitled to participate in an annual meeting if an annual meeting was not held or action by written consent in lieu thereof did not become effective within the earlier of six (6) months after the end of the corporation’s fiscal year or fifteen (15) months after its last annual meeting or written consent in lieu thereof; or

On application of a shareholder who signed a demand for a special meeting valid under Section 79-4-7.02 if:

Notice of the special meeting was not given within thirty (30) days after the date the demand was delivered to the corporation’s secretary; or

The special meeting was not held in accordance with the notice.

The court may fix the time and place of the meeting, determine the shares entitled to participate in the meeting, specify a record date for determining shareholders entitled to notice of and to vote at the meeting, prescribe the form and content of the meeting notice, fix the quorum required for specific matters to be considered at the meeting (or direct that the votes represented at the meeting constitute a quorum for action on those matters), and enter other orders necessary to accomplish the purpose or purposes of the meeting.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 7.03; Laws, 2007, ch. 361, § 5; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 26, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2007 amendment, in (a)(1), inserted “or action by written consent in lieu thereof did not become effective” and “or written consent in lieu thereof.”

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013,
rewrote (a).

Record date for determining shareholders entitled to demand special meeting where date is not fixed under this section, see § 79-4-7.02.

Record date for determining shareholders entitled to take action without meeting where date is not otherwise determined under this section, see § 79-4-7.04.

Record date for determining shareholders entitled to notice of and to vote at annual or special shareholder’s meeting where date is not otherwise determined under this section, see § 79-4-7.05.

Participation in meeting as waiver of compliance with notice requirement for shareholders’ meeting. 64 A.L.R.3d 358.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 992-997.

18 C.J.S., Corporations § 652.

§79-4-7.04.
Action without meeting.

Action required or permitted by Section 79-4-1.01 et seq. to be taken at a shareholders’ meeting may be taken without a meeting if the action is taken by all the shareholders entitled to vote on the action. The action must be evidenced by one or more written consents describing the action taken, signed by all the shareholders entitled to vote on the action and delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records. A unanimous consent signed under this subsection is the act of the shareholders when consents signed by all shareholders have been delivered to the corporation.

The articles of incorporation may provide that any action required or permitted by Section 79-4-1.01 et seq. to be taken at a shareholder’s meeting may be taken without a meeting and without prior notice, if consents in writing setting forth the action so taken are signed by the holders of outstanding shares having not less than the minimum number of votes that would be required to authorize or take the action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote on the action were present and voted. The written consent shall bear the date of signature of the shareholder who signs the consent and be delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records.

If not otherwise fixed under Section 79-4-7.03 or 79-4-7.07, and if prior board action is not required respecting the action to be taken without a meeting, the record date for determining the shareholders entitled to take action without a meeting shall be the first date on which a signed written consent is delivered to the corporation. If not otherwise fixed under Section 79-4-7.03 or 79-4-7.07, and if prior board action is required respecting the action to be taken without a meeting, the record date shall be the close of business on the day the resolution of the board taking such prior action is adopted. No written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless, within sixty (60) days of the earliest date on which a consent delivered to the corporation as required by this section was signed, written consents signed by the holders of shares having sufficient votes to take the action have been delivered to the corporation. A written consent may be revoked by a writing to that effect delivered to the corporation before unrevoked written consents sufficient in number to take the corporation action are delivered to the corporation.

A consent signed pursuant to the provisions of this section has the effect of a vote taken at a meeting and may be described as such in any document. Unless the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or a resolution of the board of directors provides for a reasonable delay to permit tabulation of written consents, the action taken by less than unanimous written consent shall be effective when written consents signed by the holders of shares having sufficient votes to take the action are delivered to the corporation.

If Section 79-4-1.01 et seq. requires that notice of a proposed action be given to nonvoting shareholders and the action is to be taken by written consent of the voting shareholders, the corporation must give its nonvoting shareholders written notice of the action not more than ten (10) days after (i) written consents sufficient to take the action have been delivered to the corporation, or (ii) such later date that tabulation of consents is completed pursuant to an authorization under subsection (d). The notice must reasonably describe the action taken and contain or be accompanied by the same material that, under Section 79-4-1.01 et seq., would have been required to be sent to nonvoting shareholders in a notice of a meeting at which the proposed action would have been submitted to the shareholders for action.

If action is taken by less than unanimous written consent of the voting shareholders, the corporation must give its nonconsenting voting shareholders written notice of the action not more than ten (10) days after (i) written consents sufficient to take the action have been delivered to the corporation, or (ii) such later date that tabulation of consents is completed pursuant to an authorization under subsection (d). The notice must reasonably describe the action taken and contain or be accompanied by the same material that, under Section 79-4-1.01 et seq., would have been required to be sent to voting shareholders in a notice of a meeting at which the action would have been submitted to the shareholders for action.

The notice requirements in subsections (e) and (f) shall not delay the effectiveness of actions taken by written consent, and a failure to comply with such notice requirements shall not invalidate actions taken by written consent, provided that this subsection shall not be deemed to limit judicial power to fashion any appropriate remedy in favor of a shareholder adversely affected by a failure to give such notice within the required time period.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 7.04; Laws, 2007, ch. 361, § 6; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 27; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 9, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

Section 9 of Chapter 481, Laws of 2012, effective January 1, 2013 (approved April 24, 2012), amended this section. Section 27 of Chapter 382, Laws of 2012, effective January 1, 2013 (approved April 17, 2012), also amended this section. As set out above, this section reflects the language of Section 9 of Chapter 481, Laws of 2012, which contains language that specifically provides that it supersedes § 79-4-7.04 as amended by Laws of 2012, ch. 382.

The 2007 amendment rewrote the section to revise action by written consent in lieu of a meeting.

The first 2012 amendment (ch. 382), deleted “at its registered office” preceding “or to the secretary of the corporation at its principal office” in (i).

The second 2012 amendment (ch. 481), effective January 1, 2013, deleted former (h) and (i) which read: “(h) An electronic transmission may be used to consent to an action, if the electronic transmission contains or is accompanied by information from which the corporation can determine the date on which the electronic transmission was signed and that the electronic transmission was authorized by the shareholder, the shareholder’s agent, or the shareholder’s attorney-in-fact. (i) Delivery of a written consent to the corporation under this section is delivery to the corporation’s registered agent at its registered office or to the secretary of the corporation at its principal office.”

Participation in meeting as waiver of compliance with notice requirement for shareholders’ meeting. 64 A.L.R.3d 358.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 790.

18 C.J.S., Corporations § 539.

§79-4-7.05.
Notice of meeting.

A corporation shall notify shareholders of the date, time and place of each annual and special shareholders’ meeting no fewer than ten (10) nor more than sixty (60) days before the meeting date. If the board of directors has authorized participation by means of remote communication pursuant to Section 79-4-7.09 for any class or series of shareholders, the notice of such class or series of shareholders shall describe the means of remote communication to be used. Unless Section 79-4-1.01 et seq. or the articles of incorporation require otherwise, the corporation is required to give notice only to shareholders entitled to vote at the meeting.

Unless Section 79-4-1.01 et seq. or the articles of incorporation require otherwise, notice of an annual meeting need not include a description of the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called.

Notice of a special meeting must include a description of the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called.

If not otherwise fixed under Section 79-4-7.03 or 79-4-7.07, the record date for determining shareholders entitled to notice of and to vote at an annual or special shareholders’ meeting is the day before the first notice is delivered to shareholders.

Unless the bylaws require otherwise, if an annual or special shareholders’ meeting is adjourned to a different date, time or place, notice need not be given of the new date, time or place if the new date, time or place is announced at the meeting before adjournment. If a new record date for the adjourned meeting is or must be fixed under Section 79-4-7.07, however, notice of the adjourned meeting must be given under this section to persons who are shareholders as of the new record date.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 7.05; Laws, 1988, ch. 369, § 3; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 10, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, added the second sentence in (a); and made a minor stylistic change.

Applicability of this section to business that may be conducted at special shareholders’ meeting, see § 79-4-7.02.

Waiver of notice, see § 79-4-7.06.

Shareholders’ list to be made available for inspection by shareholder beginning two business days after notice of shareholder’s meeting is given, see § 79-4-7.20.

Applicability of this section to notice of a shareholders’ meeting to consider amendments to articles of incorporation, see § 79-4-10.03.

Applicability of this section to notice of shareholders’ meeting to consider restatement of articles of incorporation, see § 79-4-10.07.

Applicability of this section to notice of shareholders’ meeting to consider plan of merger or share exchange, see § 79-4-11.04.

Applicability of this section to notice of shareholders’ meeting to consider sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, property of corporation other than in regular course of business, see § 79-4-12.02.

Requirement that corporation notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, in accordance with this section, of shareholders’ meeting to consider proposed dissolution of the corporation, see § 79-4-14.02.

Trial court did not err by finding that a corporation provided adequate notice of a special meeting to shareholders because the notice provided the location, time, date, and purpose of the shareholders meeting pursuant to Miss. Code Ann. § 79-4-7.05(a) and (c), and an attached proxy vote sheet setting forth the voting issues referenced the discussion of the issues in the minutes. Keene v. Brookhaven Acad., Inc., 28 So.3d 1285, 2010 Miss. LEXIS 107 (Miss. 2010).

Participation in meeting as waiver of compliance with notice requirement for shareholders’ meeting. 64 A.L.R.3d 358.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 803 et seq.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:999, (bylaws – notice of meetings – to holders of stock not entitled to vote), 74:1000.

6B Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1651-74:1656.

18 C.J.S., Corporations § 640.

§79-4-7.06.
Waiver of notice.

A shareholder may waive any notice required by Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq., the articles of incorporation, or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice. The waiver must be in writing, be signed by the shareholder entitled to the notice, and be delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records.

A shareholder’s attendance at a meeting:

Waives objection to lack of notice or defective notice of the meeting, unless the shareholder at the beginning of the meeting objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting.

Waives objection to consideration of a particular matter at the meeting that is not within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice, unless the shareholder objects to considering the matter when it is presented.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 7.06, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Participation in meeting as waiver of compliance with notice requirement for shareholders’ meeting. 64 A.L.R.3d 358.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 817-820.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 1191.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1001, 74:1002.

6B Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations § 74:1668.

§79-4-7.07.
Record date.

The bylaws may fix or provide the manner of fixing the record date for one or more voting groups in order to determine the shareholders entitled to notice of shareholders’ meeting, to demand a special meeting, to vote, or to take any other action. If the bylaws do not fix or provide for fixing a record date, the board of directors of the corporation may fix a future date as the record date.

A record date fixed under this section may not be more than seventy (70) days before the meeting or action requiring a determination of shareholders.

A determination of shareholders entitled to notice of or to vote at a shareholders’ meeting is effective for any adjournment of the meeting unless the board of directors fixes a new record date, which it must do if the meeting is adjourned to a date more than one hundred-twenty (120) days after the date fixed for the original meeting.

If a court orders a meeting adjourned to a date more than one hundred-twenty (120) days after the date fixed for the original meeting, it may provide that the original record date continues in effect or it may fix a new record date.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 7.07, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Record date for share dividends, see § 79-4-6.23.

Record date for determining shareholders entitled to demand special meeting where date is not fixed under this section, see § 79-4-7.02.

Record date for determining shareholders entitled to take action without meeting where date is not otherwise determined under this section, see § 79-4-7.04.

Record date for determining shareholders entitled to notice of and to vote at annual or special shareholder’s meeting where date is not otherwise determined under this section, see § 79-4-7.05.

Requirement of notice of adjourned meeting where new record date for meeting is or must be fixed under this section, see § 79-4-7.05.

Rights, duties, and liability of corporation in connection with transfer of stock of infant or incompetent. 3 A.L.R.2d 881.

Rights, duties, and liability in connection with transfer of stock of decedent. 7 A.L.R.2d 1240.

Remedy for refusal of corporation or its agent to register of effectuate transfer of stock. 22 A.L.R.2d 12.

Validity of restrictions on alienation or transfer of corporate stock. 61 A.L.R.2d 1318.

Right or duty of corporation to refuse to transfer stock on presentation of properly indorsed certificate, because of conflicting rights or claims of one other than transferee.
75 A.L.R.2d 746.

Validity and construction of provision restricting transfer of corporate stock, which conditions transfer upon consent of one other than shareholder, officer, or director of corporation.
53 A.L.R.3d 1272.

Construction and effect of “dilution” provision of employee’s stock option contract, dealing with rights where stock structure of corporation changes before option is exercised. 59 A.L.R.3d 1030.

Restrictions on transfer of corporate stock as applicable to testamentary dispositions thereof. 61 A.L.R.3d 1090.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 858 et seq., 914.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1036, 1066.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1163, 74:1164.

§79-4-7.08.
Appointment of chair to preside over meetings; duties of chair.

At each meeting of shareholders, a chair shall preside. The chair shall be appointed as provided in the bylaws, or, in the absence of such provision, by the board.

The chair, unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, shall determine the order of business and shall have the authority to establish rules for the conduct of the meeting.

Any rules adopted for, and the conduct of, the meeting shall be fair to shareholders.

The chair of the meeting shall announce at the meeting when the polls close for each matter voted upon. If no announcement is made, the polls shall be deemed to have closed upon the final adjournment of the meeting. After the polls close, no ballots, proxies or votes nor any revocations or changes thereto may be accepted.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 50, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 828.

§79-4-7.09.
Promote participation in annual and special meetings.

Shareholders of any class or series may participate in any meeting of shareholders by means of remote communication to the extent the board of directors authorizes such participation for such class or series. Participation by means of remote communication shall be subject to such guidelines and procedures as the board of directors adopts, and shall be in conformity with subsection (b) of this section.

Shareholders participating in a shareholders’ meeting by means of remote communication shall be deemed present and may vote at such a meeting if the corporation has implemented reasonable measures:

To verify that each person participating remotely is a shareholder; and

To provide such shareholders a reasonable opportunity to participate in the meeting and to vote on matters submitted to the shareholders, including an opportunity to communicate, and to read or hear the proceedings of the meeting, substantially concurrently with such proceeding.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 11, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.